Utah statutes.
58-61-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created the Psychologist Board consisting of four licensed
psychologists and one member from the general public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed, serve terms, and be compensated in
accordance with Section 58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall:
(a)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist
the division in review of complaints concerning unlawful or unprofessional
practice by a licensee in the profession regulated by the board and to advise
the division regarding the conduct of investigations of the complaints; and
(b)  disqualify any member from acting as presiding officer in any
administrative procedure in which that member has previously reviewed the
complaint or advised the division.
